Utah statutes.
7-7-8.   Reorganization, merger or consolidation of association.

Under a plan adopted by the board of directors and approved by the commissioner, an association may reorganize or merge or consolidate with any other corporation or financial institution. The corporate continuity of the resulting corporation shall possess the same incidents as that of a converted institution which has converted in accordance with this chapter.

